Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB923.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 503(b) of the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law, is amended to read:Section 503. Determination of eligibility.* * *(b) Social Security cost-of-living adjustment.--(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act to the contrary, persons who, as of December 31, [2022] 2024, [are] were enrolled in the PACENET program shall remain eligible for the PACENET program if the maximum income limit 1234567891011121314151617181920 is exceeded due solely to a Social Security cost-of-living adjustment.(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act to the contrary, persons who, as of December 31, [2022] 2024, [are] were enrolled in the PACE program shall remain eligible for the PACE program if the maximum income limit is exceeded due solely to a Social Security cost-of-living adjustment.(3) Eligibility in the PACE or PACENET program pursuant to this subsection shall expire on December 31, [2025] 2027.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0923PN0958 - 2 - 12345678910